apertium-kaa.kaa.lexc
LEXICON PRON-DEM-MINA

mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:mına CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:mınanıń CLITICS-NO-COP ;
mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:mınaǵan CLITICS-NO-COP ;
mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:mınanı CLITICS-NO-COP ;
mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:mınadan CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:mınada CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:mına% menen CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:mınaniki%{n%} CASES ;
!mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:mınadag%{ъ%}ı ATTR-SUBST ;
mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:mınaday CASES ;
mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<advl%>:mınalay CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:mınasın%{n%} CASES ;

mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:mınalar CASES-ETC ;
mına%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:mınaları%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-ANA

ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:ana CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:ananıń CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:anaǵan CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ananı CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:anadan CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:anada CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:ana% menen CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:ananiki%{n%} CASES ;
ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:anadaǵı ATTR-SUBST ;
ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:anaday CASES ;
!ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:analay CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
!ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:anası%{n%} CASES ;

ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:analar CASES-ETC ;
ana%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:anaları%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON DemonstrativePronouns

PRON-DEM-BUL ;
PRON-DEM-MINA ;
PRON-DEM-ANA ;

sol%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:sol CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
sol%<prn%>%<dem%>:so PRON-DEM-INFL ;
sol%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:sonıń% menen CLITICS-NO-COP ;
sol%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:sonısı%{n%} CASES ;

ol%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:ol CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
ol%<prn%>%<dem%>:o PRON-DEM-INFL ;
ol%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:onıń% menen CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ol%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:onısı%{n%} CASES ;

usı%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:usı CLITICS-NO-COP ;
usı%<prn%>%<dem%>:usı PRON-DEM-INFL ;
usı%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:usı% menen CLITICS-NO-COP ;
usı%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:usısı%{n%} CASES ;

! FIXME DISCUSS: Two below were lexicalized as conjunctional adverbs.
! -ндықтан affix is a feature of verbs as well though, so it will be handled as a
! productive derivation.

!ol%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reas%>%<abl%>:olıqtan # ; ! "because of that"
!sol%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reas%>%<abl%>:sonlıqtan # ; ! "because of that"


!!!!!!!   I N T E R R O G A T I V E

! Some of the words listed in the grammars I have as interrogative pronouns
! were placed in other root lexicons depending on what POS they substitute or
! act like syntactically. So (as planned for today):
! 1) "нeшe" is a <num><itg>;
! 2) "қайда, қайдан, қашан, қалай, қалайша" are <adv><itg> (the first three
! should link to a class containing location cases btw, as many current adverbs
! do);
! 3) "қанша" is added both as an interrogative pronoun and as an interrogative
! adverb /IS/
!
! What already added as interrogative pronouns are: кім, ни, нәрсe
! And to be added as interrogative pronouns are: қайсы, қандай, қанша.
! I'd like to mark қандай as <sim> form (with қандай for the upper side though),
! but wouldn't go too deeply into the structure of other two and not derive them
! from "қай" (that's what they have most likely originated from) IS
!
! Of course, "қай", "қайсы" and all other pronouns which can be used as an
! attribute were added as determiners linking to CLIT as well.
! Good idea is to have an rlx rule selecting determiner reading when a word is
! ambiguous between (prn X nom) and (det X) and there is noun to the right;
! and selecting pronoun if there is a verb to the right.

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<prn%>%<itg%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYSI

qaysı%<prn%>%<itg%>%<nom%>:qaysı CLITICS-NO-COP ;
qaysı%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>:qaysınıń CLITICS-NO-COP ;
qaysı%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:qaysıǵan CLITICS-NO-COP ;
qaysı%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:qaysını CLITICS-NO-COP ;
qaysı%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:qaysıdan CLITICS-NO-COP ;
qaysı%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:qaysıda CLITICS-NO-COP ;
qaysı%<prn%>%<itg%>%<ins%>:qaysı% menen CLITICS-NO-COP ;

qaysı%<prn%>%<itg%>:qaysı GER-POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANSHA

qansha%<prn%>%<itg%>:qansha CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANDAY

qanday%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:qanday CLITICS-NO-COP ;
qanday%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:qanday CASES ;
qanday%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:qandayı%{n%} CASES ;
qanday%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:qandaylar CASES ;
qanday%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:qandayları%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON InterrogativePronouns

PRON-ITG-QAYSI ;
PRON-ITG-QANSHA ;
PRON-ITG-QANDAY ;
nárse:nárse PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "thing" ! Use/MT
ne:ne PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
kim:kim PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"

LEXICON PRON-QNT-POSS

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: GER-POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: GER-INFL ;

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-IND-PL

%<prn%>%<ind%>%<pl%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIP

%<prn%>%<recip%>: GER-POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

CASES-ETC ;
%<advl%>:she CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

! FIXME JNW please have a look at this
! Listing all forms here because of overgeneration with *өздерім,
! *өздеріміз, *өзіңдер etc while linking to POSSESSIVES. This was the idea.
! Now they are handled more like personal pronouns (the same tags in the same
! order), so they should pass transfer without any trouble.
!-----
! A remaining problem with reflexive pronoun is that it takes personal copula
! suffixes "selectively": e.g. prn.refl.px1sg would take only cop.px1sg
! (prn.ref.px3sp seems to take all of them though).
! A little bit of overgeneration won't hurt anyone :), but I think that odd
! forms could be filtered out somehow later. Don't know how to do it./04Aug, IS/

! FIXME DISCUSS Write full forms for the lower side and put only PRON-DEF in the
! Root Lexicon

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}m PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ń PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}m%{I%}z PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%>%{I%}ń PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ń%{I%}z PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%>l%{A%}r%>%{I%}ń%{I%}z PRON-REF-ADV ;

! This is how it was before:
!%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSSESSIVES ;
!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>:l%{A%}р POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRNNEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-XXX ! To categorise

%<prn%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM

%<prn%>%<dem%>: CASES ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     DETERMINERS

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-COMMON

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NUM

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}nsh%{I%} # ;             
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}nsh%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NUM-TWENTY

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>nsh%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-ITG ! This is a temporal solution
                ! (could be integrated with the above)

%<num%>%<itg%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}nsh%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

 LEXICON Numerals
nol:nol NUM ; ! ""
bir:bir NUM ; ! ""
eki:eki NUM ; ! ""
úsh:úsh NUM ; ! ""
tórt:tórt NUM ; ! ""
bes:bes NUM ; ! ""
altı:altı NUM ; ! ""
jeti:jeti NUM ; ! ""
segiz:segiz NUM ; ! ""
toǵız:toǵız NUM ; ! ""
on:on NUM ; ! ""
on% bir:on% bir NUM ; ! ""
on% eki:on% eki NUM ; ! ""
on% úsh:on% úsh NUM ; ! ""
on% tórt:on% tórt NUM ; ! ""
on% bes:on% bes NUM ; ! ""
on% altı:on% altı NUM ; ! ""
on% jeti:on% jeti NUM ; ! ""
on% segiz:on% segiz NUM ; ! ""
on% toǵız:on% toǵız NUM ; ! ""
jigirma:jigirma NUM-TWENTY ; ! "twenty"
otız:otız NUM ; ! ""
qırıq:qırıq NUM ; ! ""
eliw:eliw NUM ; ! ""
alpıs:alpıs NUM ; ! ""
jetpis:jetpis NUM ; ! ""
seksen:seksen NUM ; ! ""
toqsan:toqsan NUM ; ! ""
júz:júz NUM ; ! ""
mıń:mıń NUM ; ! ""
on% mıń:on% mıń NUM ; ! ""
million:million NUM ; ! ""
milliard:milliard NUM ; ! ""
trillion:trillion NUM ; ! ""
bir:birew NUM-COLL ;
eki:ekew NUM-COLL ;
úsh:úshew NUM-COLL ;
tórt:tórtew NUM-COLL ;
bes:besew NUM-COLL ;
altı:altaw NUM-COLL ;
jeti:jetew NUM-COLL ;
I:I NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
II:II NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
III:III NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IV:IV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
V:V NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VI:VI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VII:VII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VIII:VIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IV:IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
X:X NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XI:XI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XII:XII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIII:XIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIV:XIV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XV:XV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVI:XVI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII:XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVIII:XVIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIX:XIX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XX:XX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI:XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
neshe:neshe NUM-ITG ;
LEXICON Common
alpıs:alpıs NUM ;
altaw:altaw NUM-COLL ;
altı:altı NUM ;
altı:altı NUM ;
ana:ana DET-DEM ;
anaw:anaw DET-DEM ;
bermandaǵı:bermandaǵı PRON-DEM ;
biz:biz PRON-DEM ;
bulkaradaǵı:bulkaradaǵı PRON-DEM ;
bunday:bunday PRON-DEM ;
duzgi:duzgi PRON-DEM ;
janındaǵı:janındaǵı PRON-DEM ;
olardaǵı:olardaǵı PRON-DEM ;
ondaǵı:ondaǵı PRON-DEM ;
ortanǵı:ortanǵı PRON-DEM ;
ozǵın:ozǵın PRON-DEM ;
qanday:qanday PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "which one"
qaydaǵı:qaydaǵı PRON-DEM ;
shalǵay:shalǵay PRON-DEM ;
